src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/V-s58_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Verb - mala: # 
    mala+V+Inf: mala
    mala+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: melur
    mala+V+Ind+Prt+3Sg: mól
    mala+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: mólu
    mala+V+Sup: malið
